test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv9_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    stong+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: stong
    stong+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: stong
    stong+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: stong
    stong+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: stangar
    stong+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: stengur
    stong+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: stongum
    stong+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: stanga
    stong+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: stongin
    stong+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: stongina
    stong+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: stongini
    stong+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: stangarinnar
    stong+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: stengurnar
    stong+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: stongunum
    stong+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: stanganna
